Utah statutes.
58-20a-501.   Unprofessional conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct" includes:
(1)  acting dishonestly or fraudulently in the performance of professional
duties as an environmental health scientist or environmental health scientist-
in-training;
(2)  intentionally filing a false report or record in the performance of
professional duties as an environmental health scientist or environmental
health scientist-in-training; and
(3)  willfully impeding or obstructing another person from filing a report in
the performance of professional duties as an environmental health scientist or
environmental health scientist-in-training.
